Washington statutes.
RCW 18.51.070

Rules.

The department, after consultation with the board of health, shall adopt, amend, and promulgate such rules, regulations, and standards with respect to all nursing homes to be licensed hereunder as may be designed to further the accomplishment of the purposes of this chapter in promoting safe and adequate medical and nursing care of individuals in nursing homes and the sanitary, hygienic, and safe conditions of the nursing home in the interest of public health, safety, and welfare.

[ 2011 c 151 s 3; 1979 ex.s. c 211 s 64; 1951 c 117 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1979 ex.s. c 211 s 64: "Section 64 of this 1979 act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately [May 30, 1979]." [ 1979 ex.s. c 211 s 71.]